scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     apagizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapaginaa
     apagizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidapaginaa
     apagizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapaginaan
     apagizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apaginaad
     apagizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epaginaad
     apagizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apagizh 
     apigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapigwaanaa
     apigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapigwaanaan
     apigwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apigwaanaad
     apigwaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epigwaanaad
     apigwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: apigwaazh
     apiitagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapiitagoonaa
     apiitagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indapiitagoonaa
     apiitagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapiitagoonaan
     apiitagoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apiitagoonaad
     apiitagoozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epiitagoonaad
     apiitagoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apiitagoozh
     asekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasekaanaa
     asekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindasekaanaa
     asekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidasekaanaa
     asekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasekaanaan
     asekaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asekaanaad
     asekaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esekaanaad
     asekaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asekaazh
     asemaakaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindasemaakaanaa
     asemaakaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasemaakaanaan
     asemaakaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asemaakaanaad
     asemaakaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esemaakaanaad
     asemaakaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asemaakaazh
     asigaawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+?: nindasigaawanaanaanig
     asigaawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+3SgObv: odasigaawanaawaan
     asigaawazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asigawaanaawaad
     asigaawazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl+3SgObv: esigaaawanaawaad
     asigaawazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asigaawazh
     ashidaakobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashidaakobinaa
     ashidaakobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odashidaakobinaan
     ashidaakobizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashidaakobinaad
     ashidaakobizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshidaakobinaad
     ashidaakobizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashidaakobizh
     ayina'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indayina'anaa
     ayina'azh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odayina'anaan
     ayina'azh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayina'anaad
     ayina'azh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eyina'anaad
     ayina'azh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ayina'azh
     azhebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhebinaa
     azhebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindazhebinaa
     azhebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidazhebinaa
     azhebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhebinaan
     azhebizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhebinaad
     azhebizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhebinaad
     azhebizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhebizh
     azhedaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhedaabaanaa
     azhedaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhedaabaanaan
     azhedaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhedaabaanaad
     azhedaabaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhedaabaanaad
     azhedaabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhedaabaazh
     azhewizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndazhewinaa
     azhewizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhewinaan
     azhewizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhewinaad
     azhewizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhewinaad
     azhewizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhewizh
     aaba'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaba'oonaa
     aaba'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaba'oonaan
     aaba'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaba'oonaad
     aaba'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaba'oozh
     aabatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabatebinaa
     aabatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabatebinaan
     aabatebizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabatebinaad
     aabatebizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabatebizh
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabibinaa
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabibinaa
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabibinaa
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabibinaa
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabibinaan
     aabibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: oyaabibinaan
     aabibizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabibinaad
     aabibizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabibinaad
     aabibizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabibizh
     aabiskobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabiskobinaa
     aabiskobizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskobinaan
     aabiskobizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiskobinaad
     aabiskobizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskobinaad
     aabiskobizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiskobizh
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabitoobanaa
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabitoobanaa
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabitoobanaa
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabitoobanaan
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabitoobanaad
     aabitoobazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabitoobanaad
     aabitoobazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabitoobazh 
     aabitoojiipizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabitoojiipinaa
     aabitoojiipizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabitoojiipinaan
     aabitoojiipizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabitoojiipinaad
     aabitoojiipizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabitoojiipizh
     aaboojibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaboojibinaa
     aaboojibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaaboojibinaa
     aaboojibizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboojibinaan
     aaboojibizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboojibinaad
     aaboojibizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaboojibinaad
     aaboojibizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboojibizh
     aaboojigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaboojigwaanaa
     aaboojigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaboojigwaanaa
     aaboojigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboojigwaanaan
     aaboojigwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboojigwaanaad
     aaboojigwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboojigwaazh
     aadizookaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaadizookaanaa
     aadizookaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaadizookaanaan
     aadizookaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aadizookaanaad
     aadizookaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaadizookaanaad
     aadizookaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aadizookaazh
     aandagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaandagoonaa
     aandagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3Sg: niyaandagoonaa
     aandagoozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandagoodoon
     aandagoozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandagoonaad
     aandagoozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandagoozh
     aandakizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaandakinaa
     aandakizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandakinaan
     aandakizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandakinaad
     aandakizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandakizh
     aandapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaandapinaa
     aandapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandapinaan
     aandapizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandapinaad
     aandapizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaandapinaad
     aandapizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandapizh
     aandashkimaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaandashkimaanaa
     aandashkimaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandashkimaanaad
     aandashkimaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandashkimaanaan
     aandashkimaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandashkimaanaad
     aandashkimaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandashkimaazh
     aanikoogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanikoogwaanaa
     aanikoogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanikoogwaanaan
     aanikoogwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanikoogwaanaad
     aanikoogwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3Sg: aanikoogwaazh
     aanjigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaanjigwaanaa
     aanjigwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanjigwaanaan
     aanjigwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanjigwaanaad
     aanjigwaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanjigwaanaad
     aanjigwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanjigwaazh
     aanjinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaanjinikaanaa
     aanjinikaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanjinikaanaan
     aanjinikaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanjinikaanaad
     aanjinikaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanjinikaanaad
     aanjinikaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanjinikaazh
     aanjiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanjiwinaa
     aanjiwizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanjiwinaan
     aanjiwizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanjiwinaad
     aanjiwizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aanjiwizh
     aapida'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaapida'oonaa
     aapida'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaapida'oonaan
     aapida'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aapida'oonaad
     aapida'oozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaapida'oonaad
     aapida'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aapida'oozh
     aapidapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaapidapinaa
     aapidapizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaapidapinaan
     aapidapizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aapidapinaad
     aapidapizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaapidapinaad
     aapidapizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aapidapizh
     aapijinazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaapijinanaa
     aapijinazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaapijinanaa
     aapijinazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaapijinanaa
     aapijinazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaapijinanaan
     aapijinazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aapijinanaad
     aapijinazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaapijinanaad
     aapijinazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aapijinazh 
     aatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaatebinaa
     aatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaatebinaa
     aatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaatebinaa
     aatebizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaatebinaan
     aatebizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aatebinaad
     aatebizh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaatebinaad
     aatebizh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aatebizh
     aawada'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaawada'oonaa
     aawada'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawada'oonaan
     aawada'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawada'oonaad
     aawada'oozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawada'oonaad
     aawada'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawada'oozh
     aawajidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabajidaabaanaa
     aawajidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaawajidaabaanaa
     aawajidaabaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawajidaabaanaan
     aawajidaabaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawajidaabaanaad
     aawajidaabaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawajidaabaazh
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawajinigaanaa
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawajinigaanaa
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawajinigaanaa
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawajinigaanaan
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawajinigaanaad
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawajinigaanaad
     aawajinigaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawajinigaazh
     aawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawanaa
     aawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawanaa
     aawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaawanaa
     aawazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawanaan
     aawazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawanaad
     aawazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawanaad
     aawazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawazh
     aawekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaawekaanaa
     aawekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaawekaanaa
     aawekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaawekaanaa
     aawekaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaawekaanaan
     aawekaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aawekaanaad
     aawekaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaawekaanaad
     aawekaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawekaazh
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaazhawa'oonaa
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaazhawa'oonaa
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaazhawa'oonaa
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaazhawa'oonaa
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaazhawa'oonaan
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aazhawa'oonaad
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaazhawa'oonaad
     aazhawa'oozh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aazhawa'oozh
